Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.500

Fairness in lending act—Short title.

RCW 30A.04.505 through 30A.04.515 shall be known and may be cited as the "fairness in lending act".

[ 2014 c 37 s 142; 1977 ex.s. c 301 s 10. Formerly RCW 30.04.500.]

NOTES:

Unfair practices of financial institutions: RCW 49.60.175.